North Dakota, session 69, SB2131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 52-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Workforce training center funding distribution.
The state board for career and technical education shall distribute the total amount
appropriated for the biennium for workforce training as follows:
1. Sixty percent divided equally among the workforce training centers;
2. Twenty percent apportioned among the workforce training centers based on each
center's average number of training hours provided by each center during the first
three consecutive fiscal years of the previous four fiscal years immediately preceding
the year of distribution; and
3. Twenty percent apportioned among the workforce training centers based on each
center's average number of unduplicated participants reported by each center during
the first three consecutive fiscal years of the previous four fiscal years immediately
preceding the year of distribution.
Page No. 1 25.0989.01000